Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2236.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1509.1. Alerting residential customers to potential water leaks.(a) Notification.--(1) Upon a determination by a public utility through a meter reading that a residential customer is experiencing atypical water consumption, the public utility shall notify the residential customer by telephone or email, if that contact information is available.(2) Notification under paragraph (1) must include:(i) A statement alerting the residential customer that the atypical water consumption may be a sign of a 123456789101112131415161718 potential water leak stemming from the property of the residential customer.(ii) An estimate of the residential customer's projected balance for the next two billing cycles, assuming that the atypical water consumption trend continues.(iii) A brief questionnaire, subject to the residential customer's consent, designed to assess whether the residential customer has knowledge of changes in the water consumption practices that may account for the atypical water consumption on the property of the residential customer.(iv) Written or verbal guidance on best practices for avoiding and identifying water leaks on residential property.(b) Site visits.--(1) Upon a determination by a public utility that a residential customer is unaware of recent changes in water consumption practices that may account for the atypical water consumption, and subject to the express consent of the residential customer, the public utility shall offer to perform a site visit to the property of the residential customer.(2) A site visit under this subsection:(i) Shall consist of the inspection of the water meter and connecting apparatus of the residential customer and a visual inspection of the property of the residential customer.(ii) Shall not require physical disturbances of the property of the residential customer, including 20260HB2236PN2929 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 excavation or alteration of physical structures.(3) An employee executing a site visit under this subsection shall:(i) Document the site visit through photographic documentation of inspected areas.(ii) If possible, at the conclusion of the site visit, secure the residential customer's signature attesting to the performance of the site visit.(c) Limitations.--(1) A public utility and an employee of a public utility shall not be held liable for failing to identify a water leak within the property line or structure during a site visit under subsection (b).(2) An employee of a public utility may refuse to execute a site visit if there are unsafe physical conditions, actual denial of entry to the property or constructive denial of entry to the property at the time of the site visit or based on the public utility's records of past interactions with the residential customer. The employee shall document the refusal with specificity.(3) A public utility may not consider a residential customer's atypical water consumption for purposes that are outside of those permitted by State law and regulation or that are deemed necessary to comply with this section.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Atypical water consumption." Irregular or abnormal water consumption by a residential customer that exceeds the residential customer's average monthly or billing period 20260HB2236PN2929 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 consumption over a 12-month period by at least 200% or $200. The term does not include nonessential uses of water as defined under 52 Pa. Code § 65.1 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2236PN2929 - 4 - 1234